Louisiana, session 2026, HB365.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:492(A)(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and reenacted
to read as follows:
§492. Probation and tenure of bus operators
A. Each school bus operator shall serve a probationary term of three years
reckoned from the date of his first employment in the city, parish, or other local
public school system in which the operator is serving his probation. During the
probationary term, the city, parish, or other local public school board superintendent
may discipline, dismiss, or discharge any operator upon the written recommendation
of the local superintendent of schools accompanied by valid and shall provide to the
operator in writing the reasons therefor. A school board superintendent shall
immediately dismiss or discharge an operator who is convicted of or has pled nolo
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1018 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 365
contendere to a violation of a parish or municipal ordinance that prohibits operating
a vehicle while intoxicated or any of the following offenses relative to operating a
vehicle while intoxicated, regardless of whether the violation occurred while the
operator was performing an official duty or responsibility as a school bus operator
at the time of the offense:
* * *